California, session 20252026, AB1251.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 440) is added to Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, to read: Article 3.5. Job Postings440. (a)Every private employer who publicly advertises a job posting shall include in the posting a statement disclosing whether the posting is for a vacancy for the advertised position or not. The statement shall be clear, conspicuous, and written in a legible font.(b)A violation of this section constitutes unfair competition, which includes unfair, deceptive, untrue, or misleading advertising under Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.